District of Columbia statutes.
15-909

Enforcement of foreign judgments.

(a)

If an action is brought to enforce a judgment of another jurisdiction expressed in a foreign money and the judgment is recognized in the District as enforceable, the enforcing judgment must be entered as provided in section 15-907, whether or not the foreign judgment confers an option to pay in an equivalent amount of United States dollars.

(b)

A foreign judgment may be filed in accordance with any rule or statute of the District providing a procedure for its recognition and enforcement.

(c)

A satisfaction or partial payment made upon the foreign judgment, on proof thereof, must be credited against the amount of foreign money specified in the judgment, notwithstanding the entry of judgment in the District.

(d)

A judgment entered on a foreign-money claim only in United States dollars in another state must be enforced in the District in United States dollars only.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791
1981 Ed., § 15-909.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.